Foma_files/german-flags.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [1PSGPRES] [2PSGPRES] [3PSGPRES] [1PPLPRES] [2PPLPRES] [3PPLPRES] [PERFPART] @U.PERFPART.ON@ @U.PERFPART.OFF@

LEXICON Root

Prefix;

LEXICON Prefix

@U.PERFPART.ON@:@U.PERFPART.ON@ge  Verb;
@U.PERFPART.OFF@                   Verb;

LEXICON Verb

spielen:spiel VerbInfl;

LEXICON VerbInfl

[1PSGPRES]:e  VerbEnd1;
[2PSGPRES]:st VerbEnd1;
[3PSGPRES]:t  VerbEnd1;
[1PPLPRES]:en VerbEnd1;
[2PPLPRES]:t  VerbEnd1;
[3PPLPRES]:en VerbEnd1;
[PERFPART]:t  VerbEnd2;

LEXICON VerbEnd1

@U.PERFPART.OFF@ #;

LEXICON VerbEnd2

@U.PERFPART.ON@ #;
